Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.005

Intent.

(1) It is the intent of the legislature that only individuals who meet and maintain minimum standards of competence and conduct established under this chapter for certified, licensed, or registered real estate appraisers may provide real estate appraisal services to the public.

(2) It is the further intent of the legislature to provide for the proper supervision and training of new entrants to the appraiser profession through the implementation of the state-registered appraiser trainee classification.

[ 2005 c 339 s 1; 1996 c 182 s 1; 1993 c 30 s 1; 1989 c 414 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: "(1) Sections 1, 2, 4, 7, 9, 13, 20, and 22 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2005.

(2) Sections 3, 5, 6, 8, 10 through 12, 14 through 18, and 21 of this act take effect April 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 339 s 26.]

Effective dates—1996 c 182: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1996, except section 3 of this act, which shall take effect July 1, 1997." [ 1996 c 182 s 16.]